Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 3. Temporary Administration

§ 2-7-301.
Appointment of special administrator; when to be made.

When there is delay in granting letters from any cause, or when the letters are granted irregularly, or no sufficient bond is filed as required, or when no application is made for letters, or when a personal representative dies or is suspended or removed, the district court shall appoint a special administrator to collect and take charge of the estate of the decedent in whatever county or counties the estate assets may be found, and to exercise all powers necessary for the preservation of the estate.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 9, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4639; C.S. 1910, § 5506; C.S. 1920, § 6779; R.S. 1931, § 88-1801; C.S. 1945, § 6-1101; W.S. 1957, § 2-114; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-401; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

A coadministrator may be appointed

to act with administratrix, with latter's consent. Lethbridge v. Lauder, 13 Wyo. 9, 76 P. 682,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1904).

And calling him “special administrator” does not vitiate appointment.—

Fact that a coadministrator, appointed to act with an administratrix, is misnamed “special administrator” does not vitiate his appointment. Lethbridge v. Lauder, 13 Wyo. 9, 76 P. 682,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1904).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianships and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-7-302.
Appointment of special administrator; entry of order and issuance of letters.

The appointment may be made at any time without notice. Appointment shall be made by entry upon the minutes of the court specifying the powers to be exercised by the special administrator. Upon entry of the order and filing of the required bond, the clerk shall issue letters to the person in conformity with the order.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 9, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4640; C.S. 1910, § 5507; C.S. 1920, § 6780; R.S. 1931, § 88-1802; C.S. 1945, § 6-1102; W.S. 1957, § 2-115; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-402; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-303.
Appointment of special administrator; preferences; appeal precluded.

In making the appointment of a special administrator, the court or officer shall give preference to the person entitled to letters but no appeal to the supreme court shall be allowed from the appointment.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 9, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4641; C.S. 1910, § 5508; C.S. 1920, § 6781; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 124; R.S. 1931, § 88-1803; C.S. 1945, § 6-1103; W.S. 1957, § 2-116; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-403; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

For rules of procedure governing appeals generally, see Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

§ 2-7-304.
Special administrator; surety and oath.

Before any letters are issued to any special administrator, he shall provide such surety as the court or officer directs. He shall take the usual oath and have the oath endorsed on his letters.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 9, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4642; C.S. 1910, § 5509; C.S. 1920, § 6782; R.S. 1931, § 88-1804; C.S. 1945, § 6-1104; W.S. 1957, § 2-117; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-404; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to oath of executors and administrators generally, see §

2-3-101

.

§ 2-7-305.
Special administrator; powers and duties; no liability to creditors.

The special administrator shall collect and preserve for the personal representative all goods, chattels, debts and effects of the decedent, and all incomes, rents, issues and profits, claims and demands of the estate. He shall take the charge and management of, enter upon, and preserve from damage, waste and injury, the real estate. For any and all necessary purposes he may commence and maintain or defend suits and other legal proceedings as an administrator. He may sell the perishable property as the court or officer may order to be sold, and exercise such other powers as are conferred upon him by his appointment, but in no case is he liable to any creditor on a claim against the decedent.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 9, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 4643; C.S. 1910, § 5510; C.S. 1920, § 6783; R.S. 1931, § 88-1805; C.S. 1945, § 6-1105; W.S. 1957, § 2-118; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-405; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Special administrator may act to preserve decedent's rightof appeal. —

Special administrator for estate of party to action who dies after judgment was entered could file petition in error to review judgment or apply for extension of time within which to file petition so as to preserve appeal under statute which limits time to appeal. Rowray v. McCarthy, 48 Wyo. 108, 42 P.2d 54,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1935) (decided prior to abolishment of proceedings in error). See Rule 1.06, W.R.A.P.

§ 2-7-306.
Special administrator; cessation of powers.

When letters on the estate of the decedent have been granted, the powers of the special administrator cease, and he shall forthwith deliver to the personal representative all the property and effects of the decedent in his hands, and the personal representative may prosecute to final judgment any suit commenced by the special administrator.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 9, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 4644; C.S. 1910, § 5511; C.S. 1920, § 6784; R.S. 1931, § 88-1806; C.S. 1945, § 6-1106; W.S. 1957, § 2-119; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-406; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to barring of claims upon failure of creditors to apply for letters within two years, see §

2-4-212

.

§ 2-7-307.
Special administrator; rendition of account.

The special administrator shall render an account, on oath, of his proceedings, in like manner as other personal representatives are required to do.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 9, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 4645; C.S. 1910, § 5512; C.S. 1920, § 6785; R.S. 1931, § 88-1807; C.S. 1945, § 6-1107; W.S. 1957, § 2-120; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-407; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to reporting and accounting by personal representatives, see §§

2-7-806

and

2-7-811

.